District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.24

Suspension of prohibitions against use — Concerts.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit the giving of concerts in the United States Capitol Grounds, at such times as will not interfere with the Congress, by any band in the service of the United States, when and as authorized by the Architect of the Capitol.

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 720, ch. 707, § 13

History

1981 Ed., § 9-126.
1973 Ed., § 9-130.

Prior Codifications